Wisconsin, session 2025, AB214.
do enact as follows:AB214,11Section 1. 60.10 (1) (b) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:AB214,3,2260.10 (1) (b) 2m. In a town with a population of 2,500 or more, provide Provide 3for the appointment by the town board of the town clerk, town treasurer, or both, or 4of the combined office of town clerk and town treasurer under s. 60.305 (1), at a level 1of compensation to be set by the board that may not be reduced during the term to 2which the person is appointed.AB214,23Section 2. 60.30 (1e) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB214,3,11460.30 (1e) (f) If Subject to s. 60.305 (4) (a), if a person is appointed to office 5under par. (e), the person initially appointed may not take office until the term of 6office of the incumbent town clerk, town treasurer, or combined town clerk and town 7treasurer expires there is a vacancy in that position, as described under s. 17.03. A 8person appointed to the office of town clerk or town treasurer, or to the combined 9office of town clerk and town treasurer, shall serve for a term, not to exceed 3 years, 10that is set by the town board. The person may be reappointed and may be dismissed 11by the board only for cause, as defined in s. 17.001.AB214,312Section 3. 60.305 (4) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 60.305 (4) (a) 1. and 13amended to read:AB214,3,161460.305 (4) (a) 1. A Subject to subd. 2., a combination of offices under this 15section takes effect on the latest date that any current term of an office to be 16combined expires.AB214,417Section 4. 60.305 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB214,3,221860.305 (4) (a) 2. The town board may provide that a combination of offices 19under this section takes effect immediately as both positions become vacant, as set 20forth in s. 17.03, or, if the person appointed to the combined office holds one of the 21offices to be combined, immediately upon a vacancy in the other office to be 22combined.AB214,523Section 5. 60.331 of the statutes is amended to read:AB214,4,52460.331 Deputy town clerk. Each town clerk may appoint one or more 1deputies for whom the town clerk is responsible. A deputy shall take and file the 2official oath and bond under s. 60.31. The town clerk may designate a deputy to 3shall perform the clerk’s duties during the absence, sickness or other disability 4upon direction of the clerk or upon inability of the clerk to perform the clerk’s 5duties. A deputy town clerk need not be a resident of the town.AB214,66Section 6. 60.341 of the statutes is amended to read:AB214,4,13760.341 Deputy town treasurer. Each town treasurer may appoint a deputy 8one or more deputies for whom the treasurer is responsible. The A deputy shall 9take and file the official oath and bond under s. 60.31. In case of the absence, 10sickness or other disability of the treasurer, the The deputy shall perform the 11treasurer’s duties upon direction of the treasurer or upon inability of the treasurer 12to perform the treasurer’s duties. A deputy town treasurer need not be a resident of 13the town.AB214,714Section 7. 65.90 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is repealed.AB214,815Section 8. 82.19 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB214,4,181682.19 (2) (a) Every highway shall cease to be a public highway 4 years from 17the date on which it was laid out, except the parts of the highway that have been 18opened, traveled, or worked within that time.AB214,4,1919